Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2104
Registration
required.

(1) Before
performing any construction work in Nebraska, a contractor shall be registered
with the department. If a contractor does business under more than one name,
the contractor shall obtain a registration number for each name under which
the contractor is doing business. Any
person who performs work or has work performed on his or her own property
or any person who earns less than five thousand dollars annually for construction
services is not a contractor for purposes of the Contractor Registration Act.

(2) An exemption
from the requirements under subsection (1) of this section does not exempt
a contractor from withholding requirements under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB204, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB162, § 3.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.